Arkansas, session 2025, HB1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 8, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-8-608. Use of state or local funds to contract with lobbyist
prohibited.
(a) A governmental body shall not use state or local funds to enter
into a contract with a lobbyist for the purpose of lobbying on behalf of the
governmental body.
(b) The prohibition under subsection (a) of this section includes
without limitation the use of state or local funds by a governmental body to
pay membership dues to an organization that engages in lobbying on behalf of
the governmental body or similar governmental bodies, including without
limitation employing one (1) or more persons registered as a lobbyist to
lobby on behalf of the governmental body or similar governmental bodies, if
*MBM221*
04/02/2025 9:29:47 AM MBM221

HB1973
state or local funds are used to pay the membership dues.
(c) This section does not prohibit a governmental body from employing
one (1) or more individuals to engage in lobbying on behalf of the
governmental body, including without limitation one (1) or more individuals
registered as lobbyists.































04/02/2025 9:29:47 AM MBM221